District of Columbia statutes.
44-1508

Authority to prevent cruelty to children.

The Washington Humane Society is authorized to extend its operations to the protection of children as well as animals from cruelty and abuse. In pursuance thereof the said Society may cause its proper officers or agents to prefer complaints, before any court in the District of Columbia having jurisdiction, for the violation of any law relating to or affecting the protection of children in said District, and by its proper attorney may aid in bringing the facts before such court in any proceeding taken.

Feb. 13, 1885, 23 Stat. 302, ch. 58, § 1
1973 Ed., § 32-208.
1981 Ed., § 32-908.